Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 2. Prostitution

§ 2631.
Definitions.

As used in this section:

The term “prostitution” shall be construed to include the offering or receiving of the body for sexual intercourse for hire and shall also be construed to include the offering or receiving of the body for indiscriminate sexual intercourse without hire.

The term “lewdness” shall be construed to mean open and gross lewdness.

The term “assignation” shall be construed to include the making of an appointment or engagement for prostitution or lewdness as defined in this section.

§ 2632.
Prostitution.

A person shall not:

occupy a place, structure, building, or conveyance for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

knowingly permit a place, structure, building, or conveyance owned by the person or under the person’s control to be used for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

receive or offer, or agree to receive, a person into a place, structure, building, or conveyance for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

permit a person to remain in a place, structure, building, or conveyance for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

direct, take or transport, or offer or agree to take or transport a person to a place, structure, building, or conveyance or to any other person knowingly, or with reasonable cause to know that the purpose of such directing, taking, or transporting is prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

procure or solicit or offer to procure or solicit a person for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

reside in, enter or remain in a place, structure, or building or enter or remain in a conveyance for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation;

engage in prostitution, lewdness, or assignation; or

aid or abet prostitution, lewdness, or assignation, by any means whatsoever.

A person who violates a provision of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $100.00 or may be imprisoned not more than one year. For a second offense such person shall be imprisoned for not more than three years.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 49, § 14; 2017, No. 44, § 2.

§ 2633.
Repealed.
1973, No. 201 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 2634.
Terms of probation.

Probation or parole shall be granted or ordered in the case of a person infected with a venereal disease only on such terms and conditions as shall ensure medical treatment therefor and prevent the spread of such disease.

§ 2635.
Slave traffic.

A person shall not:

induce, entice, or procure a person to come into the State or to go from the State for the purpose of prostitution or for any immoral purpose or to enter a house of prostitution in the State;

willfully or knowingly aid such person in obtaining transportation to or within the State for such purposes;

place a person in the charge or custody of another person for immoral purposes or in a house of prostitution;

induce, entice, procure, or compel such person to reside in a house of prostitution; or

induce, entice, procure, or compel such person to live a life of prostitution.

A person violating a provision hereof shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years nor less than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00 nor less than $200.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 2001, No. 49, § 15; 2019, No. 131 (Adj. Sess.), § 48.

§ 2635a.
Repealed. 2011, No. 55, § 17(c).

§ 2636.
Unlawful procurement.

A person shall not:

induce, entice, procure, or compel a person, for the purpose of prostitution or for any other immoral purposes, to enter a house of prostitution;

receive money or other valuable consideration for or on account of placing a person in a house of prostitution;

pay money or other valuable consideration to procure a person for the purpose of placing such person for immoral purposes in a house of prostitution, with or without the person’s consent; or

knowingly receive money or other valuable thing for or on account of procuring or placing a person in a house of prostitution for immoral purposes, with or without the person’s consent.

A person violating a provision hereof shall be punished as provided in section 2635 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 49, § 16, eff. June 12, 2001.

§ 2637.
Appropriating or levying upon earnings of prostitute.

A person shall not:

hold, detain, or restrain a person in a house of prostitution for the purpose of compelling such person, directly or indirectly, by the person’s voluntary or involuntary service or labor, to pay, liquidate, or cancel a debt, dues, or obligations incurred or claimed to have been incurred in such house of prostitution; or

accept, receive, levy, or appropriate money or other valuable thing from the proceeds or earnings of a person engaged in prostitution.

An acceptance, receipt, levy, or appropriation of such money or valuable thing shall be presumptive evidence of lack of consideration.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be punished as provided in section 2635 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 2001, No. 49, § 17.

§ 2638.
Immunity from liability.

As used in this section:

“Human trafficking” has the same meaning as in section 2651 of this title.

“Prostitution” has the same meaning as in section 2631 of this title.

A person who, in good faith and in a timely manner, reports to law enforcement that the person is a victim of or a witness to a crime that arose from the person’s involvement in prostitution or human trafficking shall not be cited, arrested, or prosecuted for a violation of the following offenses:

section 2632 of this title (prostitution);

section 2601a of this title (prohibited conduct);

18 V.S.A. § 4230(a)(1)-(3) (cannabis possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4231(a)(1) and (2) (cocaine possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4232(a)(1) and (2) (LSD possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4233(a)(1) and (2) (heroin possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4234(a)(1) and (2) (depressant, stimulant, and narcotic drugs possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4234a(a)(1) and (2) (methamphetamine possession);

18 V.S.A. § 4235(b)(1) (hallucinogenic drugs possession); and

18 V.S.A. § 4235a(a)(1) (Ecstasy possession).

The immunity provisions of this section apply only to the use and derivative use of evidence gained as a proximate result of the person reporting to law enforcement that the person is a victim of or a witness to a crime that arose from the person’s involvement in prostitution or human trafficking and do not preclude prosecution of the person on the basis of evidence obtained from an independent source.

A person who qualifies for immunity pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section shall not be subject to the provisions of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84, subchapter 2 concerning property subject to forfeiture, except that prima facie contraband shall be subject to forfeiture.

Except in cases of reckless or intentional misconduct, law enforcement shall be immune from liability for citing or arresting a person who is later determined to qualify for immunity under this section.

HISTORY:

Added 2021, No. 29, § 2.